West Virginia, session 2026, HB5444.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 12. PROBATION AND PAROLE. §62-12-17.  Conditions of release on probation and parole.(a) Release and supervision on parole of any person, including the supervision by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation of any person paroled by any other state or by the federal government, shall be upon the following conditions:(1) That the parolee may not, during the period of his or her parole, violate any criminal law of this or any other state or of the United States;(2) That the parolee may not, during the period of his or her parole, leave the state without the consent of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation;(3) That the parolee complies with the rules prescribed by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation for his or her supervision by the parole officer;(4) That in every case in which the parolee for a conviction is seeking parole from an offense against a child, defined in §61-8-12 of this code, §61-8B-1 et seq. or §61-8D-1 et seq. of this code, or similar convictions from other jurisdictions where the parolee is returning or attempting to return to this state pursuant to the provisions of §15A-7-4 of this code, the parolee may not live in the same residence as any minor child nor exercise visitation with any minor child nor may he or she have any contact with the victim of the offense; and(5) That the parolee, and all federal or foreign state probationers and parolees whose supervision may have been undertaken by this state, pay a fee, based on his or her ability to pay, not to exceed  $50 per month to defray the costs of supervision.(b) The Commissioner of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall keep a record of all actions taken and account for moneys received. All moneys shall be deposited in a special account in the State Treasury to be known as the Parolee's Supervision Fee Fund. Expenditures from the fund shall be for the purposes of providing the parole supervision required by the provisions of this code and are not authorized from collections, but are to be made only in accordance with appropriation by the Legislature and in accordance with the provisions of article three, chapter twelve of this code and upon the fulfillment of the provisions set forth in article two, chapter five-a of this code. Amounts collected which are found, from time to time, to exceed the funds needed for purposes set forth in this article may be transferred to other accounts or funds and redesignated for other purposes by appropriation of the Legislature.(c) The Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall consider the following factors in determining whether a parolee or probationer is financially able to pay the fee:(1) Current income prospects for the parolee or probationer, taking into account seasonal variations in income;(2) Liquid assets of the parolee or probationer, assets of the parolee or probationer that may provide collateral to obtain funds and assets of the parolee or probationer that may be liquidated to provide funds to pay the fee;(3) Fixed debts and obligations of the parolee or probationer, including federal, state and local taxes and medical expenses;(4) Child care, transportation and other reasonably necessary expenses of the parolee or probationer related to employment; and(5) The reasonably foreseeable consequences for the parolee or probationer if a waiver of, or reduction in, the fee is denied.(d) In addition, the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation may impose, subject to modification at any time, any other conditions which the division considers advisable.(e) The Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation may order substance abuse treatment as a condition or as a modification of parole, only if the standardized risk and needs assessment indicates the offender has a high risk for reoffending and a need for substance abuse treatment.(f) The Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation may impose, as an initial condition of parole, a term of reporting to a day report center or other community corrections program only if the standardized risk and needs assessment indicates a moderate to high risk of reoffending and moderate to high criminogenic need. Any parolee required to report to a day report center or other community corrections program is subject to all the rules and regulations of the center or program and may be removed at the discretion of the center's or program's director. The Commissioner of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall enter into a master agreement with the Division of Administrative Services, Justice and Community Services section to provide reimbursement to counties for the use of community corrections programs by eligible parolees. Any placement by the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation of a parolee in a day report center or other community corrections program may only be done with the center or program director's consent and the parolee is subject to all of the rules and regulations of the center or program and may be removed by the director. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home